lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 18117 o ę . 1518
SFX 18117 o ę . 1519
SFX 18117 o usys . 1520
SFX 18117 o usių . 1521
SFX 18117 o usiems . 1522
SFX 18117 o usiem . 1523
SFX 18117 o usius . 1524
SFX 18117 o usiais . 1525
SFX 18117 o usiuose . 1526
SFX 18117 o usiuos . 1527
SFX 18117 o ę . 1528
SFX 18117 o usys . 1529
SFX 18117 o usi . 1530
SFX 18117 o us . 1531
SFX 18117 o usios . 1532
SFX 18117 o usiai . 1533
SFX 18117 o usią . 1534
SFX 18117 o usia . 1535
SFX 18117 o usioje . 1536
SFX 18117 o usioj . 1537
SFX 18117 o usi . 1538
SFX 18117 o us . 1539
SFX 18117 o usios . 1540
SFX 18117 o ę . 1540
SFX 18117 o usių . 1541
SFX 18117 o usioms . 1542
SFX 18117 o usiom . 1543
SFX 18117 o usias . 1544
SFX 18117 o usiomis . 1545
SFX 18117 o usiom . 1546
SFX 18117 o usiose . 1547
SFX 18117 o usios . 1548
SFX 18117 o ę . 1548
SFX 18117 o usysis . 1549
SFX 18117 o usysai . 1550
SFX 18117 o usiojo . 1551
SFX 18117 o usiajam . 1552
SFX 18117 o usįjį . 1553
SFX 18117 o usiuoju . 1554
SFX 18117 o usiajame . 1555
SFX 18117 o usiajam . 1556
SFX 18117 o usysis . 1557
SFX 18117 o usysai . 1558
SFX 18117 o usieji . 1559
SFX 18117 o usiųjų . 1560
SFX 18117 o usiesiems . 1561
SFX 18117 o usiesiem . 1562
SFX 18117 o usiuosius . 1563
SFX 18117 o usiaisiais . 1564
SFX 18117 o usiuosiuose . 1565
SFX 18117 o usiuosiuos . 1566
SFX 18117 o usieji . 1567
SFX 18117 o usioji . 1568
SFX 18117 o usiosios . 1569
SFX 18117 o usiajai . 1570
SFX 18117 o usiąją . 1571
SFX 18117 o usiąja . 1572
SFX 18117 o usiojoje . 1573
SFX 18117 o usiojoj . 1574
SFX 18117 o usioji . 1575
SFX 18117 o usiosios . 1576
SFX 18117 o usiųjų . 1577
SFX 18117 o usiosioms . 1578
SFX 18117 o usiosiom . 1579
SFX 18117 o usiąsias . 1580
SFX 18117 o usiosiomis . 1581
SFX 18117 o usiosiom . 1582
SFX 18117 o usiosiose . 1583
SFX 18117 o usiosios . 1584
SFX 18117 ėsi ęsis . 1508
SFX 18117 osi ęsis . 1508
SFX 18117 ėsi ęsi . 1518
SFX 18117 osi ęsi . 1518
SFX 18117 ėsi iusis [^dt]ėsi 1530
SFX 18117 dėsi džiusis . 1530
SFX 18117 tėsi čiusis . 1530
SFX 18117 osi usis . 1530
SFX 18117 ėsi iusiosi [^dt]ėsi 1540
SFX 18117 dėsi džiusiosi . 1540
SFX 18117 tėsi čiusiosi . 1540
SFX 18117 osi usiosi . 1540
SFX 18117 ė ius [^dt]ė 1585
SFX 18117 dė džius . 1585
SFX 18117 tė čius . 1585
SFX 18117 o us . 1585
SFX 18117 ėsi iusis [^dt]ėsi 1585
SFX 18117 dėsi džiusis . 1585
SFX 18117 tėsi čiusis . 1585
SFX 18117 osi usis . 1585

SFX 18155 Y 32
SFX 18155 ė iusian [^dt]ė 1586
SFX 18155 ė iusiuosna [^dt]ė 1587
SFX 18155 ė iusion [^dt]ė 1588
SFX 18155 ė iusiosna [^dt]ė 1589
SFX 18155 ė iusiajan [^dt]ė 1590
SFX 18155 ė iusiuosiuosna [^dt]ė 1591
SFX 18155 ė iusiojon [^dt]ė 1592
SFX 18155 ė iusiosiosna [^dt]ė 1593
SFX 18155 dė džiusian . 1586
SFX 18155 dė džiusiuosna . 1587
SFX 18155 dė džiusion . 1588
SFX 18155 dė džiusiosna . 1589
SFX 18155 dė džiusiajan . 1590
SFX 18155 dė džiusiuosiuosna . 1591
SFX 18155 dė džiusiojon . 1592
SFX 18155 dė džiusiosiosna . 1593
SFX 18155 tė čiusian . 1586
SFX 18155 tė čiusiuosna . 1587
SFX 18155 tė čiusion . 1588
SFX 18155 tė čiusiosna . 1589
SFX 18155 tė čiusiajan . 1590
SFX 18155 tė čiusiuosiuosna . 1591
SFX 18155 tė čiusiojon . 1592
SFX 18155 tė čiusiosiosna . 1593
SFX 18155 o usian . 1586
SFX 18155 o usiuosna . 1587
SFX 18155 o usion . 1588
SFX 18155 o usiosna . 1589
SFX 18155 o usiajan . 1590
SFX 18155 o usiuosiuosna . 1591
SFX 18155 o usiojon . 1592
SFX 18155 o usiosiosna . 1593

SFX 18156 Y 16
SFX 18156 ė iusiu [^dt]ė 1594
SFX 18156 ė iusi [^dt]ė 1595
SFX 18156 ė iusiuoju [^dt]ė 1596
SFX 18156 ė iusioji [^dt]ė 1597
SFX 18156 dė džiusiu . 1594
SFX 18156 dė džiusi . 1595
SFX 18156 dė džiusiuoju . 1596
SFX 18156 dė džiusioji . 1597
SFX 18156 tė čiusiu . 1594
SFX 18156 tė čiusi . 1595
SFX 18156 tė čiusiuoju . 1596
SFX 18156 tė čiusioji . 1597
SFX 18156 o usiu . 1594
SFX 18156 o usi . 1595
SFX 18156 o usiuoju . 1596
SFX 18156 o usioji . 1597

SFX 18527 Y 6
SFX 18527 o o . 1504
SFX 18527 ė ė . 1504
SFX 18527 o ę . 1519
SFX 18527 ė ę . 1519
SFX 18527 o us . 1585
SFX 18527 ė us . 1585

SFX 18533 Y 16
SFX 18533 ai ai . 1598
SFX 18533 ai iau [^dijt]ai 152
SFX 18533 dai džiau . 152
SFX 18533 iai iau . 152
SFX 18533 jai jau . 152
SFX 18533 tai čiau . 152
SFX 18533 ai iausiai [^dijt]ai 157
SFX 18533 dai džiausiai . 157
SFX 18533 iai iausiai . 157
SFX 18533 jai jausiai . 157
SFX 18533 tai čiausiai . 157
SFX 18533 ai iausia [^dijt]ai 1599
SFX 18533 dai džiausia . 1599
SFX 18533 iai iausia . 1599
SFX 18533 jai jausia . 1599
SFX 18533 tai čiausia . 1599

SFX 18539 Y 5
SFX 18539 ai ėliau [^i]ai 155
SFX 18539 čiai tėliau . 155
SFX 18539 džiai dėliau . 155
SFX 18539 iai ėliau [^žč]iai 155
SFX 18539 žiai žėliau [^d]žiai 155

SFX 18554 Y 7
SFX 18554 i i . 1598
SFX 18554 i iau [^t]i 152
SFX 18554 ti čiau . 152
SFX 18554 i iausiai [^t]i 157
SFX 18554 ti čiausiai . 157
SFX 18554 i iausia [^t]i 1599
SFX 18554 ti čiausia . 1599

SFX 18557 Y 1
SFX 18557 i ėliau . 155

SFX 18562 Y 5
SFX 18562 g g . 1598
SFX 18562 0 el . 1600
SFX 18562 0 iau . 152
SFX 18562 0 iausia . 157
SFX 18562 0 iausiai . 1601

SFX 18565 Y 1
SFX 18565 0 ėliau . 155

SFX 18568 Y 4
SFX 18568 a a [^it]a 1598
SFX 18568 a iau [^it]a 152
SFX 18568 a iausia [^it]a 157
SFX 18568 a iausiai [^it]a 1601

SFX 18570 Y 1
SFX 18570 a ėliau [^it]a 155

SFX 18573 Y 28
SFX 18573 ui ui [^dij]ui 1598
SFX 18573 ui iau [^dij]ui 152
SFX 18573 ui iausiai [^dij]ui 157
SFX 18573 ui iausia [^dij]ui 1599
SFX 18573 iui iui [^čž]iui 1598
SFX 18573 iui iau [^čž]iui 152
SFX 18573 iui iausiai [^čž]iui 157
SFX 18573 iui iausia [^čž]iui 1599
SFX 18573 čiui čiui . 1598
SFX 18573 čiui čiau . 152
SFX 18573 čiui čiausiai . 157
SFX 18573 čiui čiausia . 1599
SFX 18573 žiui žiui [^d]žiui 1598
SFX 18573 žiui žiau [^d]žiui 152
SFX 18573 žiui žiausiai [^d]žiui 157
SFX 18573 žiui žiausia [^d]žiui 1599
SFX 18573 džiui džiui . 1598
SFX 18573 džiui džiau . 152
SFX 18573 džiui džiausiai . 157
SFX 18573 džiui džiausia . 1599
SFX 18573 dui dui . 1598
SFX 18573 dui džiau . 152
SFX 18573 dui džiausiai . 157
SFX 18573 dui džiausia . 1599
SFX 18573 jui jui . 1598
SFX 18573 jui jau . 152
SFX 18573 jui jausiai . 157
SFX 18573 jui jausia . 1599

SFX 18575 Y 7
SFX 18575 ui ėliau [^dij]ui 155
SFX 18575 iui ėliau [^čž]iui 155
SFX 18575 čiui tėliau . 155
SFX 18575 žiui žėliau [^d]žiui 155
SFX 18575 džiui dėliau . 155
SFX 18575 dui dėliau . 155
SFX 18575 jui jėliau . 155

SFX 18608 Y 6
SFX 18608 iau iau [^č]iau 152
SFX 18608 iau iausiai [^č]iau 157
SFX 18608 iau iausia [^č]iau 1599
SFX 18608 čiau čiau . 152
SFX 18608 čiau čiausiai . 157
SFX 18608 čiau čiausia . 1599

SFX 18609 Y 2
SFX 18609 iau ėliau [^č]iau 155
SFX 18609 čiau tėliau . 155

SFX 18616 Y 3
SFX 18616 omis omis . 1598
SFX 18616 omis om . 1602
SFX 18616 a a . 1598

SFX 18619 Y 2
SFX 18619 iausiai iausiai . 157
SFX 18619 iausiai iausia . 1599

SFX 18621 Y 2
SFX 18621 iausia iausia . 157
SFX 18621 iausia iausiai . 1601

AF 18533,30001 # 25
AF 18533,18539,30001 # 80
AF 18616,30001 # 93
AF 18554,18557,30001 # 113
AF 18608,30001 # 127
AF 18562,18565,30001 # 303
AF 18608,18609,30001 # 307
AF 18619,30001 # 340
AF 18554,30001 # 416
AF 18562,30001 # 422
AF 18573,30001 # 460
AF 18573,18575,30001 # 468
AF 18568,18570,30001 # 480
AF 18621,30001 # 481
