lt_LT.dic
angliškai/25	10
anksti/113	10
antiestiškai/80	10
apačiau/127	10
apsukomis/93	10
apverktinai/25	10
apčiuopomis/93	10
arti/113	10
atatupstomis/93	10
atidžiai/80	10
atsargiai/80	10
atvirkščiai/25	10
atžagariomis/93	10
aukštai/80	10
basnirčiomis/93	10
begėdiškai/25	10
blogai/80	10
bėgomis/93	10
bėgčiomis/93	10
būdingai/25	10
daug/303	10
dažnai/80	10
deramai/25	10
dešiniau/307	10
doktriniškai/80	10
drąsiai/80	10
eksperimentiškai/25	10
galiausiai/340	10
gamtiškai/25	10
garsiai/80	10
gerai/80	10
gražiai/80	10
greitosiomis/93	10
griežtai/80	10
hebrajiškai/25	10
ilgai/80	10
imčiomis/93	10
išsamiai/80	10
iššaukiančiai/25	10
kairiau/307	10
kaktomuša/93	10
kapitaliai/80	10
keliaklupstomis/93	10
keturiomis/93	10
keturpėsčiomis/93	10
kietai/80	10
klastingai/25	10
klupstomis/93	10
klūpomis/93	10
kniūbsčiomis/93	10
kniūpsčiomis/93	10
kuždomis/93	10
kūliavirsčiomis/93	10
kūlversčiomis/93	10
labai/80	10
laikinai/25	10
lengvai/80	10
linksmai/80	10
lėtai/80	10
mažai/80	10
meilingai/25	10
naujai/80	10
neabstrakčiai/25	10
neanksti/416	10
nearti/416	10
neatsitiktinai/25	10
nedaug/422	10
nedemokratiškai/25	10
neepiškai/25	10
negirdomis/93	10
negriežtai/25	10
neišskirtinai/25	10
nekokybiškai/25	10
neliūdnai/25	10
nematomis/93	10
nemoteriškai/25	10
nepagreitintai/25	10
nepakniopstomis/93	10
nepesimistiškai/25	10
nepirmiausiai/340	10
neproduktyviai/25	10
nesantūriai/25	10
nesocialistiškai/25	10
nesąmoningai/25	10
netoli/416	10
netuščiomis/93	10
netvarkingai/25	10
nevokiškai/25	10
nežaibiškai/25	10
nežinia/93	10
noromis/93	10
nuoširdžiai/80	10
oriai/25	10
pagraibomis/93	10
pakalniui/460	10
paknopstomis/93	10
panašiai/80	10
paplasta/93	10
pasiučiau/127	10
paskiau/307	10
paskiausiai/340	10
paskui/468	10
paslapčiomis/93	10
patikimai/25	10
patogiai/80	10
patykomis/93	10
pavieniui/460	10
pavėjui/460	10
piečiau/127	10
piktai/80	10
pirma/480	10
pirmučiausia/481	10
potencialiai/25	10
prabėgomis/93	10
prastai/80	10
pusiaugula/93	10
pėsčiomis/93	10
racionaliai/25	10
retai/80	10
risčiomis/93	10
ryčiau/127	10
ryškiai/80	10
rėplomis/93	10
saugiai/80	10
senai/80	10
silpnai/80	10
skubiai/80	10
slaptingai/25	10
slaptomis/93	10
smarkiai/80	10
sparčiai/80	10
stipriai/80	10
subalansuotai/25	10
svarbiai/80	10
sėdomis/93	10
tankiai/80	10
teisingai/80	10
tiesiai/80	10
tinkamai/80	10
toli/113	10
tyčia/93	10
užuolanka/93	10
vaizdingai/25	10
vakariau/127	10
vogčiomis/93	10
vėlai/80	10
vėsiai/25	10
įkalniui/460	10
įpiečiau/127	10
įryčiau/127	10
įsauliui/460	10
įvakariau/127	10
įšiauriau/127	10
įžiemiau/127	10
šaltai/80	10
šiauriau/307	10
švariai/80	10
šviesiai/80	10
žiemiau/127	10
žvairomis/93	10
